Idaho statutes. Title 70 WATERCOURSES AND PORT DISTRICTS
Chapter 4
BOISE RIVER IMPROVEMENTS

Sec.

§ 70-401. River improvements on Boise River.

River improvements, consisting of levees, jetties, dams, or other preventive measures confining the river in its proper channel, shall be constructed on the Boise River in Ada and Canyon Counties, Idaho. The character and extent of said improvement and the distance that the same shall extend up and down said river shall be determined by the commission herein provided for.

§ 70-402. Commission created — Members — Compensation.

There is hereby created a commission which shall have general supervision and control of the construction of said improvements which shall receive the same when completed and certify the completion thereof to the governor of the state of Idaho, and which shall supervise and control the disbursement of the funds provided and appropriated by this act, or so much thereof as may be necessary. Said commission shall consist of the commissioner of reclamation, and two (2) commissioners to be appointed by the governor of the state of Idaho, one (1) of whom shall be a citizen and resident of Ada County, and one (1) of whom shall be a citizen and resident of Canyon County. For their services as such commissioners, with the exception of the commissioner of reclamation, they shall each receive their actual and necessary expenses, and the sum of five dollars ($5.00) per day for each and every day’s services upon the work or in connection therewith, incurred while actually and necessarily engaged in the discharge of their duties.

Provided, that the two (2) appointive members of said commission shall be chosen immediately upon the passage and approval of this act, and said commission shall forthwith enter upon its duties.

§ 70-403. Termination of commission upon completion of improvements.

Upon the completion of the construction of the said improvements and issuance of the certificate of completion thereof to the governor of the state of Idaho, the commission provided for in section 70-402[, Idaho Code,] shall cease to exist.

§ 70-404. Duties of commissioner of reclamation.

The manner, character and extent of said improvement shall be determined by the commissioner of reclamation. The commissioner of reclamation shall, under the direction of the commission, assume charge of the engineering features of the work and such expense as may be necessary in connection with said engineering work shall be a charge against the funds herein provided.

§ 70-405. Letting work by contract to bidders — Bond.

The commission may, in its discretion, let the work herein provided for, by contract to the lowest and best bidder who shall be required to give a good and sufficient bond for the construction and completion of the said work, or the commission may employ such other means of completing and performing the work herein provided for, as in their judgment may be deemed most expedient and in the public interest.

§ 70-406. Cost of engineering work a charge against funds.

The cost and charges for engineering work for the said improvements and the expenses of the commission, together with payment of their services as provided for in section 70-402[, Idaho Code], shall be included as a part of the cost of constructing the said improvement and shall be a charge against the funds herein provided for.